Illinois, session 104th, HB327.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Judicial Circuits Districting Act of 2022 5is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 24/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Judicial Circuits Districting Act of 2022.9(Source: P.A. 102-693, eff. 1-7-22.)